Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3588
Hospital authority; corporate name.

Such authority shall be a public body corporate and politic by the name of Hospital Authority No. ...... of .............. County, Nebraska.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.86.